Utah statutes.
53A-6-302.    UPPAC members -- Executive secretary.

(1)  UPPAC shall consist of a nonvoting executive secretary and 11 voting members, nine of whom shall be licensed educators in good standing, and two of whom shall be members nominated by the education organization within the state that has the largest membership of parents of students and teachers.

(2)  Six of the voting members shall be persons whose primary responsibility is teaching.

(3) (a)  The state superintendent of public instruction shall appoint an employee of the office to serve as executive secretary.

(b)  Voting members are appointed by the superintendent as provided under Section 53A-6-303.

(4)  The office shall provide staff support for UPPAC activities.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 108, 1999 General Session

